Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 7 Sexual Abuse and Sexual Assault Awareness and Prevention

Sec. 14.30.355.
Sexual abuse and sexual assault awareness and prevention.

The governing body of each school district shall adopt and implement a policy, establish a training program for employees and students, and provide parent notices relating to sexual abuse and sexual assault awareness and prevention for students enrolled in grades kindergarten through 12.

The policy, training, and notices adopted under this section must include

age-appropriate information;

warning signs of sexual abuse of a child;

referral and resource information;

available student counseling and educational support;

methods for increasing teacher, student, and parent awareness of issues regarding sexual abuse of children;

actions that a child may take to prevent and report sexual abuse or sexual assault; and

a procedure allowing a student to be excused from participating in training or from receiving notices under this section at the written request of a parent or guardian of the student, or of the student if the student is emancipated or 18 years of age or older.

The training required for teachers under this section may be provided as a part of the continuing education required under AS

18.66.310

.

In this section,

“school district” has the meaning given in AS

14.30.350

;

“sexual abuse” or “sexual assault” has the meaning given to “sexual abuse” in AS

47.10.990

.

History.

(§ 14 ch 2 SSSLA 2015)

Effective dates. —

Section 28,
ch. 2, SSSLA 2015 made this section effective June 30, 2017.

Sec. 14.30.356.
Teen dating violence and abuse awareness and prevention program; training and notices.

The department, in consultation with school districts, shall develop and approve a program relating to teen dating violence and abuse awareness and prevention for grades seven through 12. The program must

include training for employees and students;

provide parent notices; and

be reviewed periodically by a qualified individual or committee for consistency with generally accepted standards for a teen dating violence and abuse awareness and prevention program.

The training, notices, and instruction adopted under this section must include

age-appropriate information;

the warning signs of dating violence and abusive behavior;

characteristics of healthy relationships;

measures to prevent and stop dating violence and abuse;

community resources available to victims of dating violence and abuse; and

a procedure allowing a student to be excused from participating in training or from receiving notices under this section at the written request of a parent or guardian of the student, or of the student if the student is emancipated or 18 years of age or older.

The training required for teachers under this section may be provided as a part of the continuing education required under AS

18.66.310

.

In this section,

“dating violence and abuse” means a pattern of behavior in which one person threatens to use, or actually uses, physical, sexual, verbal, emotional, or psychological abuse to control the person’s dating partner;

“school district” has the meaning given in AS

14.30.350

.

History.

(§ 14 ch 2 SSSLA 2015; am §§ 1, 2 ch 51 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For provision providing that a program approved under this section be known as the “Bree Moore Teen Dating Violence Awareness and Prevention Program”, see sec. 4, ch. 51, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective October 9, 2018, rewrote (a); in the introductory language in (b), deleted “policy,” preceding “training”.

Effective dates. —

Section 28,
ch. 2, SSSLA 2015 made this section effective June 30, 2017.